dictionaries/uk/index.dic
адгезувати/XytN
алгоритмувати/XytN
ансамблювати/Xyt
асоційовувати/Xyt
балансувати/Xyt
бевкнути/X
блазнювати/Xyt
борознувати/XytN
бруталізуватися/Xyt
бутити/Xy
варіювати/Xyt
ввертітися/X
вгніздитися/XL
вдивитися/XL
вередувати/Xyt
взаємозв'язуватися/Xyt
вибачити/XJN
вибудувати/X'
вивищуватися/Xyt
вигвинтитися/XL
вигострюватися/Xyt
видихувати/Xyt'
вижбурювати/Xyt'
виїздити/XytLNJ
виковувати/Xyt'
викреслитися/XJL
вилаштуватися/X
вилучитися/XL
вимилювати/Xyt
вимуштровуватися/Xyt
випарити/XNJ
виплутуватися/Xyt
випратися/X
вирачкувати/X
висадити/XLN
вискалювати/Xyt
висмолитися/X
вистрілити/XJN
витверджуватися/Xyt
витопитися/X
витупувати/Xyt
вихіснувати/X'
вицілити/XN
вичорнити/XN
виштовхнути/XlN
відбенкетувати/X
відгвинтити/XNL
віддерти/Xl
відзвітуватися/X
відкоркуватися/X
відмітингувати/X
відплющити/XNJ
відрощуватися/Xyt
відстругуватися/Xyt
відхилювати/Xyt'
відшрубовувати/Xyt'
вколювати/Xyt'
вменшувати/Xyt
ворухнути/X
впоюватися/Xyt
вскакувати/Xyt
втихомирюватися/Xyt
вхоплюватися/Xyt
гарбувати/Xyt
гірчити/Xy
градуюватися/Xyt
дахуватися/Xyt
делімітувати/XytN
детектуватися/Xyt
дистилювати/XytN
довіяти/X'
дознятися/X
долічити/XLN
дооснащувати/Xyt
дорікнути/X
достругуватися/Xyt
дошкварити/XN
екранувати/XytN
жертвувати/Xyt'
забарити/X
забутиновувати/Xyt
заволожити/XJN
заглушуватися/Xyt
задавати/Xyt'
задурювати/Xyt'
закапсулюватися/X
заколочувати/Xyt
закропитися/XL
заломлювати/Xyt'
замирювати/Xyt'
занечиститися/X
заперти/Xl
запомповувати/Xyt
зарекомендовувати/X
засинитися/X
засніжувати/Xyt
застрочувати/Xyt'
затовкти/XN
затьмарювати/Xyt'
захрьопуватися/Xyt
зашамотіти/X
защебенювати/Xyt
зблювати/X
звільнювати/Xyt'
згорблюватися/Xyt
здобути/Xl
зіслати/X'
зляшитися/X
зморгнутися/X
знеміцнити/XNL
зобачити/X
зронити/XLN
ідентифікуватися/Xyt
інтимізувати/XytN
картелюватися/Xyt
кмітувати/Xyt
консервувати/XytN
котувати/Xyt
курвити/Xyt
лікуватися/Xyt
мандражувати/Xyt
мигнути/X
морфологізувати/XN
набутися/X
нагнічувати/Xyt
надірватися/X
нажаритися/XJ
накопіювати/XN
налупцювати/XN
наніжитися/X
напресовувати/Xyt
насидітися/XJ
настрибнути/X
научитися/XL
нашпиговувати/Xyt
недоплатити/XLN
нютувати/Xyt
обгородитися/XL
обкурити/XLN
обмінювати/Xyt'
обрисовувати/Xyt'
обтісуватися/Xyt
огранювати/Xyt'
ознайомити/XJN
опалюватися/Xyt
опублікуватися/X
остерегти/XN
очолювати/Xyt'
паювати/Xyt
перевербовувати/Xyt
перегорнутися/X
перез'єднуватися/Xyt
переклеювати/Xyt'
перелаштовувати/Xyt'
перемовити/XN
переобчислювати/Xyt
переплигнути/X
перередаговувати/Xyt
пересортувати/XN
перетрактувати/XN
перечитувати/Xyt'
підбудовувати/Xyt'
підзорити/X
підладити/XJN
підострожувати/Xyt
підселюватися/Xyt
підтінити/XNL
пластифікувати/XytN
побудувати/XN
повилущуватися/X
повідводити/XJ
погастролювати/X
подибувати/Xyt
позаблоковувати/X'
позапрошувати/X
позліплювати/X'
поклювати/X
полегшити/XJN
пометати/XY
поназбирувати/X'
поневолюватися/Xyt
пообтрушуватися/X
поперекручувати/X'
попідперізуватися/X
попокрутитися/X
поприковувати/X
порекламуватися/X
порозорювати/X'
посвячуватися/Xyt
посолонцювати/XN
потасувати/X
потягнути/XNl
поцяткувати/XN
правувати/Xyt
пригамовувати/Xyt
приїздити/XytL
приманювати/Xyt'
припарковувати/Xyt'
присвятити/XLN
присушитися/XL
прицитьнути/XJ
пробубоніти/X
проговорити/XLN
продряпуватися/Xyt
проколювати/Xyt'
промаркувати/XN
пропертися/X
просилити/X
простромлюватися/Xyt
протруювати/Xyt
прошнуруватися/X
реабілітуватися/Xyt
ренатуралізуватися/Xyt
розбазарюватися/Xyt
розвісити/XJN
роздарувати/XN
розказати/X'
розкошуватися/Xyt
розлюбитися/XL
розніжити/XN
розпломбовувати/Xyt
розрубити/XN
розсупонити/XNJ
розфасуватися/X
розшморгнути/X
самозаколисуватися/Xyt
сатурувати/Xyt
сіктися/Xy
сколоти/XNl
скрикнути/X
совістити/Xyt
спізнаватися/Xyt
спольщувати/Xyt'
спрощуватися/Xyt
стоваришувати/X
струсонутися/X
схвалюватися/Xyt
телеграфуватися/Xyt
топитися/XLyt
трудитися/XLyt
увігнути/Xl
удержуватися/Xyt
уключити/XLN
умащуватися/Xyt
упектися/X
урватися/X
усовістити/XL
утлумачити/XJN
ушикувати/XN
флейцювати/Xyt
хеджувати/Xyt
цвірінькотіти/Xyt
черкнутися/X
шикувати/XytN
щавитися/XytL
